Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2305
Institutions receiving assistance;
report; contents.

Each
institution receiving assistance pursuant to section 79-2304 shall report
annually to the State Department of Education. The report shall give a description
of the operation of the high school equivalency program for which assistance
was provided and shall include information on the following for the most recently
completed fiscal year:

(1) The number
of diplomas of high school equivalency awarded pursuant to such high school
equivalency program;

(2) The number
of participants in the high school equivalency program who moved successfully
through the continuum of literacy skill levels offered by the program;

(3) The number
of participants completing the high school equivalency program who secured
entry-level career path employment;

(4) The number
of participants completing the high school equivalency program who went on
to postsecondary education or additional career training; and

(5) The number of participants
in the high school equivalency program who were Nebraska residents or enrolled
in a postsecondary educational institution located in Nebraska.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 5.